Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1628.06
Core public health functions; personnel.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall employ two full-time persons with expertise in the public health field to provide technical expertise in carrying out core public health functions and essential elements and coordinate the dissemination of materials to the local public health departments.

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 478.